Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 11

Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2016 [Expired]

71-5-1101. [Expired.]

Acts 2016, ch. 854, § 2; repealed by terms of §71-5-1106, effective June 30, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 11, §§71-5-1101 –71-5-1106, concerned the annual coverage assessment act of 2016.

Former § 71-5-1106 provided that: “This part shall expire on June 30, 2017; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive such expiration:

“(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed;

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-161 and §71-5-703(b)(3), as enacted by Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015.”

71-5-1102. [Expired.]

Acts 2016, ch. 854, § 2; repealed by terms of §71-5-1106, effective June 30, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 11, §§71-5-1101 –71-5-1106, concerned the annual coverage assessment act of 2016.

Former § 71-5-1106 provided that: “This part shall expire on June 30, 2017; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive such expiration:

“(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed;

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-161 and §71-5-703(b)(3), as enacted by Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015.”

71-5-1103. [Expired.]

Acts 2016, ch. 854, § 2; repealed by terms of §71-5-1106, effective June 30, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 11, §§71-5-1101 –71-5-1106, concerned the annual coverage assessment act of 2016.

Former § 71-5-1106 provided that: “This part shall expire on June 30, 2017; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive such expiration:

“(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed;

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-161 and §71-5-703(b)(3), as enacted by Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015.”

71-5-1104. [Expired.]

Acts 2016, ch. 854, § 2; repealed by terms of §71-5-1106, effective June 30, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 11, §§71-5-1101 –71-5-1106, concerned the annual coverage assessment act of 2016.

Former § 71-5-1106 provided that: “This part shall expire on June 30, 2017; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive such expiration:

“(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed;

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-161 and §71-5-703(b)(3), as enacted by Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015.”

71-5-1105. [Expired.]

Acts 2016, ch. 854, § 2; repealed by terms of §71-5-1106, effective June 30, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 11, §§71-5-1101 –71-5-1106, concerned the annual coverage assessment act of 2016.

Former § 71-5-1106 provided that: “This part shall expire on June 30, 2017; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive such expiration:

“(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed;

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-161 and §71-5-703(b)(3), as enacted by Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015.”

71-5-1106. [Expired.]

Acts 2016, ch. 854, § 2; repealed by terms of §71-5-1106, effective June 30, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 11, §§71-5-1101 –71-5-1106, concerned the annual coverage assessment act of 2016.

Former § 71-5-1106 provided that: “This part shall expire on June 30, 2017; provided, however, that the following rights and obligations shall survive such expiration:

“(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed;

“(3) The existence of the maintenance of coverage trust fund and the obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund; and

“(4) The obligation of the bureau to implement and maintain the requirements of §71-5-161 and §71-5-703(b)(3), as enacted by Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015.”